North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 1. In General.
§ 163-278.9.
Statements filed with Board.

Except as provided in

G.S. 163-278.10

A, the treasurer of each candidate and of each political committee shall file with the Board under certification of the treasurer as true and correct to the best of the knowledge of that officer the following reports:

Organizational Report. — The appointment of the treasurer as required by

G.S. 163-278.7(a)

, the statement of organization required by

G.S. 163-278.7(b)

, and a report of all contributions and expenditures not previously reported shall be filed with the Board no later than the tenth day following the day the candidate files notice of candidacy or the tenth
day following the organization of the political committee, whichever occurs first. Any candidate whose campaign is being conducted by a political committee which is handling all contributions and expenditures for his campaign
shall file a statement with the Board stating such fact at the time required herein for the organizational report. Thereafter, the candidate’s political committee shall be responsible for filing all reports required by
law.

48-Hour Report. — A political committee, political party or affiliated party committee that receives a contribution or transfer of funds shall disclose within 48 hours of receipt a contribution or transfer of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more received
before an election but after the period covered by the last report due before that election. The disclosure shall be by report to the State Board identifying the source and amount of the funds. The State Board shall specify
the form and manner of making the report, including the reporting of in-kind contributions.

Quarterly Reports. — During even-numbered years during which there is an election for that candidate or in which the campaign committee is supporting or opposing a candidate, the treasurer shall file a report by mailing or otherwise delivering it to
the Board no later than seven working days after the end of each calendar quarter covering the prior calendar quarter, except that:

The report for the first quarter shall also cover the period in April through the seventeenth day before the primary, the first quarter report shall be due seven days after that date, and the second quarter report shall not include that period if a first
quarter report was required to be filed; and

The report for the third quarter shall also cover the period in October through the seventeenth day before the election, the third quarter report shall be due seven days after that date, and the fourth quarter report shall not include that period if a
third quarter report was required to be filed.

Semiannual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made for which no reports are otherwise required by this Article, any and all such contributions and expenditures shall be reported by the last Friday in July, covering the period through
the last day of June, and shall be reported by the last Friday in January, covering the period through the last day of December.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, each report shall be current within seven days prior to the date the report is due and shall list all contributions received and expenditures made which have not been previously reported.

Candidates and committees for municipal offices are not subject to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, unless they make contributions or expenditures concerning elections covered by this Part. Reports for those candidates and committees are covered
by Part 2 of this Article.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (b) of this section, any political party (including a State, district, county, or precinct committee thereof) which is required to file reports under those subsections and under the Federal Election Campaign Act
of 1971, as amended (2 U.S.C. 434), shall instead of filing the reports required by those subsections, file with the State Board of Elections:

The organizational report required by subsection (a)(1) of this section, and

A copy of each report required to be filed under 2 U.S.C. 434, such copy to be filed on the same day as the federal report is required to be filed.

Any report filed under subsection (d) of this section may include matter required by the federal law but not required by this Article.

Any report filed under subsection (d) of this section must contain all the information required by

G.S. 163-278.11

, notwithstanding that the federal law may set a higher reporting threshold.

Any report filed under subsection (d) of this section may reflect the cumulative totals required by

G.S. 163-278.11

in an attachment, if the federal law does not permit such information in the body of the report.

Any report or attachment filed under subsection (d) of this section must be certified.

Treasurers for each of the following entities shall electronically file each report required by this section that shows a cumulative total for the election cycle in excess of the stated amount in contributions, in expenditures, or in loans, according
to rules adopted by the State Board of Elections:

A candidate for statewide office, if more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

A State, district, county, or precinct executive committee of a political party, or an affiliated party committee, if the committee makes contributions or independent expenditures in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) that affect contests for statewide
office.

A political committee that makes contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to candidates for statewide office or makes independent expenditures in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) that affect contests for statewide office.

All other political committees, if more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The State Board of Elections shall provide the software necessary to file an electronic report to a treasurer required to file an electronic report at no cost to the treasurer.

All reports under this section must be filed by a treasurer or assistant treasurer who has completed all training as to the duties of the office required by

G.S. 163-278.7(f)

.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1975, c. 565, s. 1; 1979, c. 500, ss. 3, 16; c. 730; 1981, c. 837, s. 2; 1985, c. 164, ss. 1, 6-6.2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 10A; 1997-515, ss. 1(a),
4(d1), 5(a), 12(a); 1999-31, s. 7(a), (b); 2001-235, s. 2; 2001-419, s. 7; 2001-487, s. 97(b); 2002-159, s. 21(d); 2006-195, ss. 5.1, 8; 2008-150, ss. 9(c), (d), 11(a); 2014-111, s. 18.5(a); 2015-258, s. 3(e); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146,
s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.9A.
Statements filed by referendum committees.

The treasurer of each referendum committee shall file under verification with the Board the following reports:

Organizational Report. — The appointment of the treasurer as required by

G.S. 163-278.7(a)

, the statement of organization required by

G.S. 163-278.7(b)

, and a report of all contributions and expenditures shall be filed with the Board no later than the tenth day following the organization of the referendum committee.

Pre-Referendum Report. — The treasurer shall file a report with the Board no later than the tenth day preceding the referendum.

48-Hour Report. — A referendum committee that receives a contribution or transfer of funds shall disclose within 48 hours of receipt a contribution or transfer of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more received before a referendum but after the period
covered by the last report due before that referendum. The disclosure shall be by report to the State Board of Elections identifying the source and amount of such funds. The State Board of Elections shall specify the form
and manner of making the report, including the reporting of in-kind contributions.

Final Report. — The treasurer shall file a final report no later than the tenth day after the referendum. If the final report fails to disclose a final accounting of all contributions and expenditures, a supplemental final report shall be filed no later
than January 7, after the referendum, and shall be current through December 31 after the referendum.

Annual Reports. — If contributions are received or expenditures made during a calendar year for which no reports are otherwise required by this Article, any and all such contributions and expenditures shall be reported by January 7 of the following year.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, each report shall be current within seven days prior to the date the report is due and shall list all contributions received and expenditures made which have not been previously reported.

History.
1979, c. 1073, s. 6; 1997-515, s. 12(b); 2002-159, s. 21(e); 2008-150, s. 11(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.10.
Procedure for inactive candidate or committee.

If no contribution is received or expenditure made by or on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee during a period described in

G.S. 163-278.9

, the treasurer shall file with the Board, at the time required by

G.S. 163-278.9

, a statement to that effect and it shall not be required that any inactive candidate or committee so filing a report of inactivity file any additional reports required by G.S. 163-278.9 so long as the candidate or committee
remains inactive.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 1073, s. 20; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-278.10A.
Threshold of $1,000 for financial reports for certain candidates.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, a candidate for a county office, municipal office, local school board office, soil and water conservation district board of supervisors, or sanitary district board shall be exempted from the reports
of contributions, loans, and expenditures required in

G.S. 163-278.9

(a), 163-278.40B, 163-278.40C, 163-278.40D, and 163-278.40E if to further the candidate’s campaign that candidate:

Does not receive more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in contributions, and

Does not receive more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) in loans, and

Does not spend more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). To qualify for the exemption from those reports, the candidate’s treasurer shall file a certification that the candidate does not intend to receive in contributions or loans or expend more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) to further the candidate’s campaign. The certification shall be filed with the Board at the same time the candidate files the candidate’s Organizational Report as required in

G.S. 163-278.7

,

G.S. 163-278.9

, and

G.S. 163-278.40

A. If the candidate’s campaign is being conducted by a political committee which is handling all contributions, loans, and expenditures for the candidate’s campaign, the treasurer of the political committee
shall file a certification of intent to stay within the threshold amount. If the intent to stay within the threshold changes, or if the one-thousand-dollar ($1,000) threshold is exceeded, the treasurer shall immediately
notify the Board and shall be responsible for filing all reports required in G.S. 163-278.9 and 163-278.40B, 163-278.40C, 163-278.40D, and 163-278.40E; provided that any contribution, loan, or expenditure which would have
been required to be reported on an earlier report but for this section shall be included on the next report required after the intent changes or the threshold is exceeded.

The exemption from reporting in subsection (a) of this section applies to political party committees and affiliated party committees under the same terms as for candidates, except that the term “to further the candidate’s campaign” does not relate to
a political party committee’s or an affiliated party committee’s exemption, and all contributions, expenditures, and loans during an election shall be counted against the threshold amount for a political party committee or an affiliated
committee.

History.
1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1028, s. 2; c. 1081, s. 3; 1989, c. 449; c. 770, s. 53; 1997-515, s. 4(e); 2001-235, s. 3; 2009-534, s. 5; 2015-258, s. 3(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Town of Chapel Hill: 1999-255, s. 4.

§ 163-278.11.
Contents of treasurer’s statement of receipts and expenditures.

Statements filed pursuant to provisions of this Article shall set forth the following:

Contributions. — Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a list of all contributions received by or on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee. The statement shall list the name and complete mailing address of
each contributor, the amount contributed, the principal occupation of the contributor, and the date such contribution was received. The total sum of all contributions to date shall be plainly exhibited. Forms for required
reports shall be prescribed by the Board. As used in this section, “principal occupation of the contributor” means the contributor’s:

Job title or profession; and

Employer’s name or employer’s specific field of business activity. The State Board of Elections shall prepare a schedule of specific fields of business activity, adapting or modifying as it deems suitable the business activity classifications of the Internal
Revenue Code or other relevant classification schedules. In reporting a contributor’s specific field of business activity, the treasurer shall use the classification schedule prepared by the State Board.

Expenditures. — A list of all expenditures required under

G.S. 163-278.8

made by or on behalf of a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee. The statement shall list the name and complete mailing address of each payee, the amount paid, the purpose, and the date
such payment was made. The total sum of all expenditures to date shall be plainly exhibited. Forms for required reports shall be prescribed by the Board. In accounting for all expenditures in accordance with

G.S. 163-278.8

(e) and

G.S. 163-278.8(f)

, the payee shall be the individual or person to whom the candidate, political committee, or referendum committee is obligated to make the expenditure. If the expenditure is to a financial institution for
revolving credit or a reimbursement for a payment to a financial institution for revolving credit, the statement shall also include a specific itemization of the goods and services purchased with the revolving credit. If
the obligation is for more than one good or service, the statement shall include a specific itemization of the obligation so as to provide a reasonable understanding of the obligation.

Loans. — Every candidate and treasurer shall attach to the campaign transmittal submitted with each report an addendum listing all proceeds derived from loans for funds used or to be used in this campaign. The addendum shall be in the form as prescribed
by the State Board and shall list the amount of the loan, the source, the period, the rate of interest, and the security pledged, if any, and all makers and endorsers.

Threshold for Reporting Identity of Contributor. — A treasurer shall not be required to report the name, address, or principal occupation of any individual who contributes fifty dollars ($50.00) or less to the treasurer’s committee during an election
as defined in

G.S. 163-278.13

. The State Board of Elections shall provide on its reporting forms for the reporting of contributions below that threshold. On those reporting forms, the State Board may require date and amount of contributions
below the threshold, but may treat differently for reporting purposes contributions below the threshold that are made in different modes and in different settings.

Statements shall reflect anything of value paid for or contributed by any person or individual, both as a contribution and expenditure. A political party executive committee or affiliated party committee that makes an expenditure that benefits a candidate
or group of candidates shall report the expenditure, including the date, amount, and purpose of the expenditure and the name of and office sought by the candidate or candidates on whose behalf the expenditure was made. A candidate
who benefits from the expenditure shall report the expenditure or the proportionate share of the expenditure from which the candidate benefitted as an in-kind contribution if the candidate or the candidate’s committee has coordinated
with the political party executive committee or affiliated party committee concerning the expenditure.

Best Efforts. — When a treasurer shows that best efforts have been used to obtain, maintain, and submit the information required by this Article for the candidate or political committee, any report of that candidate or committee shall be considered in
compliance with this Article and shall not be the basis for criminal prosecution or the imposition of civil penalties, other than forfeiture of a contribution improperly accepted under this Article. The State Board of Elections
shall promulgate rules that specify what are “best efforts” for purposes of this Article, adapting as it deems suitable the provisions of 11 C.F.R. § 104.7. The rules shall include a provision that if the treasurer, after complying
with this Article and the rules, does not know the occupation of the contributor, it shall suffice for the treasurer to report “unable to obtain”.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1977, c. 635, s. 2; 1979, c. 1073, s. 20; 1997-515, ss. 2(a), (b), 3(a); 2006-161, s. 4; 2006-195, s. 5; 2007-391, s. 35(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2015-258, s. 3(g); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a),
(b).

§ 163-278.12.
Special reporting of contributions and independent expenditures.

Subject to

G.S. 163-278.39

and

G.S. 163-278.14

, individuals and other entities not otherwise prohibited from doing so may make independent expenditures. In the event an individual, person, or other entity making independent expenditures but not otherwise required
to report them makes independent expenditures in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00), that individual, person, or entity shall file a statement of such independent expenditure with the appropriate board of elections in the
manner prescribed by the State Board of Elections.

Any person or entity other than an individual that is permitted to make contributions but is not otherwise required to report them shall report each contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100.00) with the appropriate board of elections in the
manner prescribed by the State Board of Elections.

In assuring compliance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the State Board of Elections shall require the identification of each person or entity making a donation of more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) to the entity filing the report if
the donation was made to further the reported independent expenditure or contribution. If the donor is an individual, the statement shall also contain the principal occupation of the donor. The “principal occupation of the donor”
shall mean the same as the “principal occupation of the contributor” in

G.S. 163-278.11

.

Contributions or independent expenditures required to be reported under this section shall be reported within 30 days after they exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) or 10 days before an election the contributions or independent expenditures affect, whichever
occurs earlier.

The State Board of Elections shall require subsequent reporting of independent expenditures according to the same schedule required of political committees under G.S. 163-278.9(a). An individual or person that makes an independent expenditure shall disclose
by report to the State Board of Elections within 48 hours of incurring an expense of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or receiving a donation of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more for making an independent expenditure
before an election but after the period covered by the last report due before that election.

For the purposes of subsection (c) of this section, a donation to the person or entity making the independent expenditure is deemed to have been donated to further the independent expenditure if any of subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection apply.
For purposes of this subsection, the “filer” is the person or entity making the independent expenditure and responsible for filing the report, or an agent of that person or entity. For purposes of this subsection, the “donor” is
the person or entity donating to the filer the funds or other thing of value, or an agent of that person or entity.

The donor designates, requests, or suggests that the donation be used for an independent expenditure or for multiple independent expenditures, and the filer agrees to use the donation for an independent expenditure.

The filer expressly solicited the donor for a donation for making or paying for an independent expenditure.

The donor and the filer engaged in substantial written or oral discussion regarding the donor’s making, donating, or paying for an independent expenditure.

The donor or the filer knew or had reason to know of the filer’s intent to make independent expenditures with the donation.A donation shall not be deemed to be made to further an independent expenditure if the donation was a commercial transaction occurring
in the ordinary course of business between the donor and the filer unless there is affirmative evidence that the amounts were donated to further an independent expenditure. In determining the amount of a donation that was
made to further any particular independent expenditure, there shall be excluded any amount that was designated by the donor with respect to a different election than the election that is the subject of the independent expenditure
covered by the report.Subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection shall also apply to reports made under subsection (c) of this section concerning contributions. However, nothing in this section shall be interpreted
to limit the effect of the prohibition on making contributions in the name of another in

G.S. 163-278.14

.

All reports required by this section shall be filed according to rules adopted by the State Board. If the expense incurred is greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the report shall be filed electronically. The State Board of Elections shall provide
the software necessary to file the electronic report to any individual or person required to file an electronic report at no cost to that individual or person.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 107, s. 15; c. 1073, s. 20; 1999-31, s. 2(d); 2004-127, s. 16; 2010-170, s. 2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.12A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-125, s. 4, effective July 20, 2004.

§ 163-278.12B.
[Repealed]

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 163-278.12C.
Special reporting of electioneering communications.

Every individual or person that incurs an expense for the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications aggregating in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall file the following reports with the appropriate board of elections
in the manner prescribed by the State Board of Elections:

The identification of the individual or person incurring the expense, of any individual or person sharing or exercising direction or control over the activities of that individual or person, and of the custodian of the books and accounts of the individual
or person incurring the expense.

The principal place of business of the person incurring the expense, if not an individual.

The amount of each expense incurred during the period covered by the statement and the identification of the individual or person to whom the expense was incurred.

The elections to which the electioneering communications pertain, if any, and the names, if known, of the candidates identified or to be identified.

The names and addresses of all entities that donated, to further an electioneering communication or electioneering communications, funds or anything of value whatsoever in an aggregate amount of more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) during the reporting
period. If the donor is an individual, the statement shall also contain the principal occupation of the donor. The “principal occupation of the donor” shall mean the same as the “principal occupation of the contributor”
in

G.S. 163-278.11

.

The initial report shall be filed with the State Board no later than the 10th day following the day the individual or person incurs an expense for the direct costs of producing or airing an electioneering communication. The State Board shall require subsequent
reporting according to the same schedule required of political committees under G.S. 163-278.9(a). An individual or person that produces or airs an electioneering communication shall disclose by report to the State Board within
48 hours of incurring an expense of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or receiving a donation of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more for making an electioneering communication before an election but after the period covered
by the last report due before that election.

For the purposes of subdivision (a)(5) of this section, a donation to the person or entity making the electioneering communication is deemed to have been donated to further the electioneering communication if any of subdivisions (1) through (4) of this
subsection apply. For purposes of this subsection, the “filer” is the person or entity making the electioneering communication and responsible for filing the report, or an agent of that person or entity. For purposes of this subsection,
the “donor” is the person or entity donating to the filer the funds or other thing of value, or an agent of that person or entity.

The donor designates, requests, or suggests that the donation be used for an electioneering communication or electioneering communications, and the filer agrees to use the donation for that purpose.

The filer expressly solicited the donor for a donation for making or paying for an electioneering communication.

The donor and the filer engaged in substantial written or oral discussion regarding the donor’s making, donating, or paying for an electioneering communication.

The donor or the filer knew or had reason to know of the filer’s intent to make electioneering communication with the donation.A donation shall not be deemed to be made to further an electioneering communication if the donation was a commercial transaction
occurring in the ordinary course of business between the donor and the filer unless there is affirmative evidence that the amounts were donated to further an electioneering communication. In determining the amount of a
donation that was made to further any particular electioneering communication, there shall be excluded any amount that was designated by the donor with respect to a different election than the election that is the subject
of the electioneering communication covered by the report.

All reports required by this section shall be filed according to rules adopted by the State Board. If the expense incurred is greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the report shall be filed electronically. The State Board shall provide the software
necessary to file the electronic report to any individual or person required to file an electronic report at no cost to that individual or person.

History.
2010-170, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act.

Session Laws 2010-170, s. 17, provides, in part: “Sections 1 through 15 of this act become effective upon preclearance by the United States Department of Justice.” Preclearance was received by letter dated September 23, 2010.

§ 163-278.13.
Limitation on contributions.

No individual, political committee, or other entity shall contribute to any candidate or other political committee any money or make any other contribution in any election in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) for that election.

Effective for each odd-numbered calendar year beginning in 2015, the dollar amount of the contribution limitation established by subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this subsection shall be increased as provided in this subsection. On July 1 of each even-numbered
year, the State Board of Elections shall calculate from data from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor Register the percent difference between the price index for the July 1 of the previous even-numbered
year. That percentage increase shall be multiplied by the previous dollar amount contribution limit, that number added to the previous dollar amount contribution limit, and the total shall become effective with respect to contributions
made or accepted on or after January 1 of the next odd-numbered year. If the amount after adjustment is not a multiple of one hundred dollars ($100.00), the total shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars
($100.00). As used in this subsection the term “price index” means the average over a calendar year of the Consumer Price Index (all items — United States city average) published monthly by the Bureau of Labor Statistics. The revised
amount of the dollar limit of contributions shall remain in effect for two calendar years until the next adjustment is made. The State Board of Elections shall publish the revised amount in the North Carolina Register and shall
notify the Revisor of Statutes who shall adjust the dollar amounts in subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section.

No candidate or political committee shall accept or solicit any contribution from any individual, other political committee, or other entity of any money or any other contribution in any election in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600)
for that election.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (c) of this section, it shall be lawful for a candidate or a candidate’s spouse to make a contribution to the candidate or to the candidate’s treasurer of any amount of money or to make any other contribution
in any election in excess of five thousand six hundred dollars ($5,600) for that election.

For the purposes of this section, the term “an election” means the period of time from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through the day of the primary, the day after the primary through the day of the second primary, or the day after the primary through
December 31 of the next even-numbered year, without regard to whether the candidate is opposed or unopposed in the election, except that where a candidate is not on the ballot in a second primary, that second primary is not “an
election” with respect to that candidate.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (c) of this section, a candidate or political committee may accept a contribution knowing that the contribution is to be reimbursed to the entity making the contribution and knowing the candidate or political committee
has funds sufficient to reimburse the entity making the contribution if all of the following conditions are met:

The entity submits sufficient information of the contribution to the candidate or political committee for reimbursement within 45 days of the contribution.

The candidate or political committee makes a reimbursement to the entity making the contribution within seven days of submission of sufficient information.

The candidate or political committee indicates on its report under

G.S. 163-278.11

that the good, service, or other item resulting in the reimbursement is an expenditure of the candidate or political committee, and notes if the contribution was by credit card.

The contribution does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

Any contribution, or portion thereof, made under subsection (f) of this section that is not submitted for reimbursement in accordance with subsection (f) of this section shall be treated as a contribution for purposes of this section. Any contribution,
or portion thereof, made under subsection (f) of this section that is not reimbursed in accordance with subsection (f) of this section shall be treated as a contribution for purposes of this section.

This section shall not apply to any national, State, district or county executive committee of any political party or an affiliated party committee. For the purposes of this section only, the term “political party” means only those political parties officially
recognized under

G.S. 163-96

.

No referendum committee which received any contribution from a corporation, labor union, insurance company, business entity, or professional association may make any contribution to another referendum committee, to a candidate or to a political committee.

The contribution limits of subsections (a) and (c) of this section do not apply to contributions made to an independent expenditure political committee. For purposes of this section, an “independent expenditure political committee” is a political committee
whose treasurer makes and abides by a certification to the State Board of Elections that the political committee does not and will not make contributions, directly or indirectly, to candidates or to political committees that make
contributions to candidates. The State Board of Elections shall provide forms for implementation of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to a candidate or a political committee controlled by a candidate. The exception
of this subsection is in addition to any other exception provided by law.

History.
1973, c. 1272, s. 1; 1979, c. 1073, ss. 8, 20; 1981, c. 225; 1987, c. 565, s. 15; 1993, c. 539, s. 1113; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-515, s. 8(a); 1999-31, s. 5(c); 2002-158, s. 2; 2006-192, ss. 15, 16, 17; 2007-391,
s. 36; 2007-484, s. 43.8(c); 2007-510, s. 1(c); 2007-540, ss. 2, 3; 2008-150, ss. 6(c), 7(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-360, s. 21.1(e), (f); 2013-381, ss. 38.1(h), (i), (j), 42.1, 42.2, 42.3, 53.1(a); 2015-258, s. 3(h); 2015-264, s.
27; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Contribution Donation Limits.

Pursuant to G.S. 163-278.13(a1), by letter from the North Carolina State Board of Elections dated July 15, 2014, the Revisor of Statutes received notification that the contribution limitation amounts in G.S. 163-278.13(a), (b), and (c) have been revised
from $5,000 to $5,100, effective January 1, 2015 through December 31, 2016.

Pursuant to G.S. 163-278.13(a1), by letter from the North Carolina State Board of Elections dated December 6, 2016, the Revisor of Statutes received notification that the contribution limitation amounts in G.S. 163-278.13(a), (b), and (c) have been revised
from $5,100 to $5,200, effective January 1, 2017 through December 31, 2018.

Pursuant to G.S. 163-278.13(a1), by letter from the North Carolina State Board of Elections dated January 8, 2019, the Revisor of Statutes received notification that the contribution limitation amounts in G.S. 163-278.13(a), (b), and (c) have been revised
from $5,200 to $5,400, effective January 1, 2019.

Pursuant to G.S. 163-278.13(b), by letter from the North Carolina State Board of Elections dated December 21, 2020, the Revisor of Statutes received notification that the contribution limitation amounts in G.S. 163-278.13(a), (c), and (d) have been revised
from $5,400 to $5,600, effective January 1, 2021.

§ 163-278.13A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-515, s. 9, effective January 1, 1998.